District of Columbia statutes.
26-1203

Authorization of regional branches.

(a)

Ninety days after October 12, 1988, a regional association or a regional savings and loan holding company may obtain a certificate of authority to establish, maintain, and acquire branches in the District on approval of the Superintendent [Commissioner].

(b)

Before granting approval, the Superintendent [Commissioner] shall determine that each of the following requirements is met:

(1)

The laws of the state in which the branching regional association or regional savings and loan holding company has its principal place of business authorize District associations or District savings and loan holding companies to establish or maintain branches in that state on terms and conditions reasonably equivalent to those applicable to the establishment or maintenance of branches in the District by District associations and District savings and loan holding companies and on terms and conditions reasonably equivalent to those applicable to the establishment or maintenance of branches in that state by an association or savings and loan holding company located in that state;

(2)

The establishment or maintenance of a branch complies with conditions, restrictions, requirements, or other limitations that would apply to the branching of a District association or District savings and loan holding company in the state in which the regional association or regional savings and loan holding company has its principal place of business, but that would not apply to the branching of an association or savings and loan holding company, all of whose branches or association subsidiaries are located in that state; and

(3)

The establishment or maintenance of a branch will not be prejudicial to the interests of the general public; among the factors to be considered by the Superintendent [Commissioner] in making a determination under this paragraph are the character, experience, and financial responsibility of the association or savings and loan holding company seeking to establish a branch and its directors and officers.

Oct. 12, 1988, D.C. Law 7-175, § 4, 35 DCR 6133

History

This section is referenced in § 26-1204, § 26-1206, and § 26-1216.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 26-903.

Prior Codifications